sv: Klibbighetsgrad för vax: Extra hög; Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
hr-HR: Razina ljepljivosti voska: Vrlo visoka; Visoka; Niska; Srednja; Ostalo
en: Wax tackiness level: Extra high; High; Low; Medium; Other
ro-RO: Nivel de aderență a cerii: Extra ridicat; Ridicat; Scăzut; Mediu; Altele
el: Επίπεδο δυνατότητας κολλήματος κεριού: Πολύ υψηλό; Υψηλό; Χαμηλό; Μεσαίο; Άλλο
pt-BR: Nível de viscosidade da cera: Extra alta; Alta; Baixa; Média; Outros
fr: Niveau d'adhérence de la cire: Extra élevée; Élevée; Faible; Moyenne; Autre
sl-SI: Raven lepljivosti voska: Zelo visoko; Visoko; Nizko; Srednje; Drugo
nl: Kleverigheid wax: Extra hoog; Hoog; Laag; Gemiddeld; Overige
it: Livello di appiccicolosità della cera: Extra elevata; Elevata; Bassa; Media; Altro
zh-TW: 蠟黏性等級: 特高; 高; 低; 中; 其他
es: Nivel de adherencia de la cera: Extraalta; Alta; Baja; Media; Otro
tr: Mum yapışkanlık seviyesi: Ekstra yüksek; Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
vi: Độ dính của sáp: Rất cao; Cao; Thấp; Trung bình; Khác
sk-SK: Úroveň lepivosti vosku: Extra vysoká; Vysoká; Nízka; Stredná; Iné
hu: Viasz ragadási szintje: Extra magas; Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
ko: 왁스 끈적임 수준: 매우 높음; 높음; 낮음; 중간; 기타
cs: Úroveň lepivosti vosku: Extra vysoká; Vysoká; Nízká; Střední; Jiná
bg-BG: Ниво на лепкавост на ваксата: Изключително висока; Висока; Ниска; Средна; Други
pl: Poziom lepkości wosku: Bardzo wysoki; Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Inne
de: Viskosität des Wachses: Extra hoch; Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Sonstige
ja: ワックス粘着性レベル: エクストラハイ; ハイ; ロー; ミディアム; その他
fi: Vahan pitävyystaso: Erittäin korkea; Korkea; Matala; Keskitaso; Muu
lt-LT: Vaško lipnumo lygis: Itin didelis; Didelis; Mažas; Vidutinis; Kita
ru: Уровень липкости воска: Очень высокая; Высокая; Низкая; Средняя; Другое
th: ระดับความเหนียวของแว็กซ์: สูงเป็นพิเศษ; สูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
da: Klæbrighedsniveau for voks: Ekstra høj; Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
nb: Klebrighetsnivå for voks: Ekstra høy; Høy; Lav; Medium; Annet
zh-CN: 蜡质粘性等级: 极高; 高; 低; 中; 其他
pt-PT: Nível de viscosidade da cera: Extra alta; Alta; Baixa; Média; Outro